Louisiana, session 2026, SB300.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:197(13) and (19) through (21), 198(E)(2), (H)(1)(c), the
introductory paragraph of (J), (J)(1)(d), 199(D)(4), 200(K), 1556(31) and (62), 1594(C)(3),
1597, 1600.2(C)(4), 1602.1(C)(2), the introductory paragraph of 1606(B), 1619(A)(1)(i),
1630, and 1691(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 39:1600.2(G),
1619(A)(2)(k), (3)(h), (4)(f), and (5)(d), 1685(F), and 1692(D) through (G) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
§197. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following words and phrases shall be
defined as follows:
* * *
(13) "Invitation to negotiate" means a written or electronically posted
solicitation for competitive sealed replies to select one or more vendors with which
to commence negotiations for the procurement of information technology systems,
information technology services, software, professional services, or consulting
services, or fiscal intermediary services.
* * *
(19) "Related services" means and is limited to service activities affecting the
maintenance of information technology equipment or software and the providing of
fiscal intermediary services and shall also include those consulting services ancillary
to the procurement of information technology hardware or software that would
otherwise be governed by the provisions of professional, personal, consulting, and
social services procurement in Chapter 17 of Subtitle III of this Title. Except for
consulting services ancillary to the procurement of fiscal intermediary services by
cooperative purchasing, such consulting services contracts shall be limited to the
lesser of twenty percent of the procurement amount or two hundred fifty thousand
dollars.
(20) "Rental contract" means and includes contracts between a supplier of
information technology equipment and the state, or a state agency, through which
information technology equipment may be leased for a term not to exceed one fiscal
year, such contracts to include the right of termination by the state upon notice of
ninety days or less, and to be renewable, upon review and recommendations of the
procurement support team and review and approval by the office of technology
services, with such renewal to be limited to one additional term not to exceed twelve
months.
(21)(20) "Software" means computer programs and documentation essential
to and necessary for an information technology system or information technology
Page 2 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
service to perform productive operations.
(22)(21) "Utility" means any information technology service provided by the
office of technology services and used in the essential operations of a state agency,
such as system authentication, data replication, and system utilization and
performance management.
§198. Types of contracts permitted
* * *
E. The use of a multiyear contract for information technology systems,
information technology services, and professional services contracts and consulting
services contracts related to information technology shall be in accordance with rules
and regulations and under the following conditions:
* * *
(2) The director of the state purchasing office of state procurement shall
approve in writing the use of a multi-year contract over three years, not to exceed
five years.
* * *
H. Rental Contracts. Upon the advance written approval of the state central
purchasing agency, state agencies may enter into contracts for the rental of
information technology equipment and related services on a month-to- month basis
for a period not to extend beyond the end of the fiscal year in which the contract is
made. All such contracts shall be entered into only as a result of competitive sealed
bidding procedures.
(1) Equipment currently installed, or installed at the beginning of a fiscal year
under a valid rental contract, may be retained at the end of the fiscal year by
renewing or extending the existing rental contract for one additional term, not to
exceed twelve months, without competitive sealed bidding procedures, subject to the
following provisions:
* * *
(c) Renewal of a rental contract shall be subject to the advance review and
recommendation of the procurement support team and to the advance written
Page 3 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
approval of the state central purchasing agency and shall be permitted only if any
proposed price increases do not exceed the supplier's current published list prices.
* * *
J. Master Agreements. The state director of purchasing chief procurement
officer may enter into master agreements with vendors with which the state conducts
substantial business over a period of time.
(1) Such agreements shall set forth those terms and conditions of specific
legal import which relate to the basic provisions according to which procurement
activity will be conducted, and shall meet the following requirements:
* * *
(d) Each master agreement must be negotiated by a procurement support
team and executed on behalf of the state by the state director of purchasing chief
procurement officer.
* * *
§199. Methods of procurement
* * *
D. Method for procuring software and software maintenance and support
services.
* * *
(4) The procurement support team shall develop and deliver to the office of
state procurement and the office of technology services proposed rules establishing
guidelines for procurement activities under this Part. Upon approval of the office of
technology services, the office of state procurement shall promulgate rules in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
* * *
§200. General provisions
The following general provisions shall apply to all procurements under this
Part:
* * *
K. The provisions of this Part shall, with respect to the procurement of
Page 4 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
information technology systems or information technology services, supersede
specifications of any contradictory or conflicting provisions of the following statutes:
R.S. 38:2211 et seq. with respect to awarding of public contracts and R.S. 39:1551
through 1736, but all other provisions in Chapter 17 of Title 39 apply to all
procurements under this Part. The provisions of this Part do not relate to the
procurement of services covered by R.S. 39:1481 through 1526 except as provided
in R.S. 39:198. The Louisiana Lease of Movables Act, R.S. 9:3301 through 3342,
shall not apply to the provisions of this Part.
* * *
§1556. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the words defined in this Section shall have the
meanings set forth below, unless the context in which they are used clearly requires
a different meaning or a different definition is prescribed for a particular Part or
provision:
* * *
(31) "Invitation to negotiate" means a written or electronically posted
solicitation for competitive sealed replies to select one or more vendors with which
to commence negotiations for the procurement of information technology systems,
information technology services, software, professional services, or consulting
services, or fiscal intermediary services.
* * *
(62) "Using agency" means any governmental body of the state which utilizes
any supplies, services, or major repairs, or professional services, personal services,
consulting services, or social services purchased under this Chapter.
* * *
§1594. Competitive sealed bids
* * *
C. Public notice.
* * *
(3) Each advertisement may be published in the official journal of the state.
Page 5 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
In the case of any purchase to meet the needs of a single budget unit the
advertisement shall may be published also in a newspaper of general circulation
printed in the parish in which the budget unit is situated or, if there is no newspaper
printed in the parish, in a newspaper printed in the nearest parish, which has a
general circulation in the parish in which the budget unit is situated.
* * *
§1597. Sole source procurements
A contract may be awarded for a required supply, service, or major repair,
consulting service, or social service, without competition when, under regulations,
the chief procurement officer or his designee above the level of procurement officer
determines in writing that there is only one source for the required supply, service,
or major repair item, consulting service, or social service.
* * *
§1600.2. Invitation to negotiate
* * *
C. The invitation to negotiate shall describe the questions being explored, the
facts being sought, and the specific goals or problems that are the subject of the
solicitation and shall be subject to all of the following conditions:
* * *
(4) Auction techniques and Insights gained during the negotiation process,
including items of cost, may be used to refine a solution. However, disclosure of
proprietary information derived from competing proposals are is prohibited while
negotiations are underway.
* * *
G. All records related to the solicitation shall be public records upon
award of the contract or contracts, unless otherwise excepted by law.
* * *
§1602.1. Prohibition of discriminatory boycotts of Israel in state procurement
* * *
C.(1) * * *
Page 6 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
(2) All competitive sealed bids and, competitive sealed proposals, and
invitations to negotiate issued for procurement contracts with executive branch
agencies shall include the text of the following certification:
"By submitting a response to this solicitation, the bidder or proposer certifies
and agrees that the following information is correct: In preparing its response, the
bidder or proposer has considered all proposals submitted from qualified, potential
subcontractors and suppliers, and has not, in the solicitation, selection, or
commercial treatment of any subcontractor or supplier, refused to transact or
terminated business activities, or taken other actions intended to limit commercial
relations, with a person or entity that is engaging in commercial transactions in Israel
or Israeli-controlled territories, with the specific intent to accomplish a boycott or
divestment of Israel. The bidder also has not retaliated against any person or other
entity for reporting such refusal, termination, or commercially limiting actions. The
state reserves the right to reject the response of the bidder or proposer if this
certification is subsequently determined to be false, and to terminate any contract
awarded based on such a false response."
* * *
§1606. Responsibility of bidders and proposers
* * *
B. Whenever the chief procurement officer, commissioner, or head of a
governmental body with such authority proposes to disqualify the lowest bidder on
bids of five thousand dollars or more that exceed the amount established by
executive order of the governor pursuant to R.S. 39:1596, such individual shall:
* * *
§1619. Social service contracts
A. Social services include:
(1) Rehabilitation and health supports include services rendered by a
contractor with special knowledge or service available to assist individuals in
attaining or maintaining a favorable condition of physical and mental health. These
services include but are not limited to:
Page 7 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
* * *
(i) Other services in support of same, including the furnishing of support
staff with specialized training to support the underlying social service objectives
and deliverables.
(2) Habilitation and socialization include services rendered by a contractor
with special knowledge to assist specified client groups to enhance their
self-sufficiency or alleviate their dependency or isolation from the community. These
services include but are not limited to:
* * *
(k) Other services in support of same, including the furnishing of support
staff with specialized training to support the underlying social service objectives
and deliverables.
(3) Protection for adults and children include services rendered by a
contractor to provide therapeutic intervention for adults or children who are in
danger or threatened with danger of physical or mental injury, neglect, maltreatment,
extortion, or exploitation, including victims of family violence. These services
include but are not limited to:
* * *
(h) Other services in support of same, including the furnishing of support
staff with specialized training to support the underlying social service objectives
and deliverables.
(4) Improvement of living conditions and health include services rendered by
an authorized contractor with special knowledge or services available to assist
individuals to attain or maintain favorable conditions in which to live. These services
include but are not limited to:
* * *
(f) Other services in support of same, including the furnishing of support
staff with specialized training to support the underlying social service objectives
and deliverables.
(5) Evaluation, testing, and remedial educational services for exceptional
Page 8 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
nonpublic school students with physical or learning disabilities include services
rendered by a contractor with special knowledge or services available to provide
special educational and related services for exceptional students or students with
disabilities voluntarily enrolled in approved nonpublic schools of Louisiana who are
not otherwise provided with such services through either their local school program
or through other services afforded to them by local school boards or other public
agencies. These services include but are not limited to:
* * *
(d) Other services in support of same, including the furnishing of support
staff with specialized training to support the underlying social service objectives
and deliverables.
* * *
§1630. Finality of determinations
The determinations required by R.S. 39:1568.1, 1597, 1598(C), 1605, 1606,
1608(C), 1612(A), 1614, and 1671(F) are final and conclusive unless the reviewing
court, exercising its appellate jurisdiction, finds they are clearly erroneous,
arbitrary, capricious, or contrary to law.
* * *
§1685. Contract and breach of contract controversies
* * *
F. A final decision of the commissioner may be made executory by the
Nineteenth Judicial District Court in accordance with Code of Civil Procedure
Article 2782.
§1691. Venue of actions by or against the state in connection with contracts
A. Solicitation and award of contracts. The Nineteenth Judicial District Court
shall have exclusive venue over an action between the state and a person, bidder,
proposer, offerer, or contractor, prospective or actual, to determine whether a
solicitation or award of a contract is in accordance with the constitution, statutes,
regulations, and the terms and conditions of the solicitation. Such actions shall
invoke, and the court shall exercise, only the appellate jurisdiction of the court.
Page 9 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
* * *
§1692. Commencement of actions
* * *
D. Actions requesting judicial review of any determination listed in R.S.
39:1630 shall be commenced within fourteen days after the receipt of the
written determination.
E. All actions under R.S. 39:1691 shall be instituted by the filing of a
petition for judicial review in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court invoking,
and the court shall exercise, only appellate jurisdiction.
F.(1) In any petition for judicial review filed pursuant to R.S. 39:1691(A),
a copy of the petition for judicial review shall be served upon the commissioner
of administration, the head of the agency which issued the solicitation, and, if
applicable, the person awarded the contract. The head of the using agency is the
chief executive or administrative officer of the using agency.
(2) In any petition for judicial review filed pursuant to R.S. 39:1691(B),
a copy of the petition for judicial review shall be served upon the commissioner
of administration.
(3) In any petition for judicial review filed pursuant to R.S. 39:1691(C),
a copy of the petition for judicial review shall be served upon the commissioner
of administration and the head of the using agency which is a party to the
contract. The head of the using agency is the chief executive or administrative
officer of the using agency.
(4) In any petition for judicial review filed pursuant to R.S. 39:1692(D),
a copy of the petition for judicial review shall be served upon the commissioner
of administration and the chief procurement officer.
G. Within sixty days after the service of the service of the petition upon
the commissioner of administration, or within further time allowed by the
court, the division of administration shall transmit to the reviewing court the
original or a certified copy of the administrative record.
Section 2. R.S. 39:197(22) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Page 10 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 300 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without the
signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the say following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 11 of 11
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.